New York, session 2025-2026, A3952.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 401 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 136 of the laws of 1969, paragraph a as 3 amended by chapter 137 of the laws of 1989, paragraph b as amended by 4 chapter 826 of the laws of 1985 and paragraph c as amended by chapter 5 356 of the laws of 1990, is amended to read as follows: 6 5. Times for registration, reregistration and renewal; proportionate 7 fees. a. Registrations, reregistrations and renewals shall take effect 8 and expire on dates determined by the commissioner; provided, however, 9 the registration for a non-commercial vehicle for which a registration 10 fee established in paragraph a of subdivision six of this section is 11 required shall not expire until the title of such motor vehicle is 12 transferred to a new owner as provided in article forty-six of this 13 chapter. The registration of any such older model year motor vehicles 14 that are currently registered shall not expire until the title of such 15 motor vehicle is transferred to a new owner as provided in article 16 forty-six of this chapter. Upon such transfer of a certificate of title 17 the new owner shall register the motor vehicle and pay the registration 18 fee established in paragraph a of subdivision six of this section. 19 However, where the expiration date of the registration of any commercial 20 vehicle, except a taxi or an omnibus, falls on a Saturday, Sunday or 21 state holiday, such registration shall be valid for the operation of 22 such vehicle until midnight of the next day on which state offices shall 23 be open for business. Provided, however, that renewal of a registration 24 may be used preceding the expiration date of such registration including 25 such expiration date. Provided, further, however, that where the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07581-01-5 A. 3952 2 1 required proof of registration consists of an expired registration for 2 the same vehicle, issued to the same person applying for the registra- 3 tion or renewal, and the expired registration certificate and number 4 plates and date tags issued for such registration had not been surren- 5 dered to the commissioner on or before the expiration date of such 6 registration, the commissioner may in [his] such commissioner's 7 discretion deem such application to be a renewal of the expired regis- 8 tration and require that the fee paid for such registration be computed 9 as if the registration had been made prior to the date of expiration of 10 the expired registration. 11 b. The fee for the renewal of a registration for a commercial vehicle 12 shall be the same as the annual registration fee, and, where a registra- 13 tion or renewal is for a period of more or less than one calendar year, 14 the annual fees as provided in this section shall be increased or 15 reduced proportionately on a daily computation basis, except that where 16 the annual registration fee for such vehicle would amount to ten dollars 17 or less, the fee shall not be so prorated. 18 c. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the commis- 19 sioner shall issue registrations and renewals of registrations for 20 commercial motor vehicles for which a registration fee established in 21 paragraph a of subdivision six of this section is required to be paid 22 and for motor vehicles having a maximum gross weight of not more than 23 eighteen thousand pounds for which a registration fee established in 24 paragraph one of schedule B of subdivision seven of this section is 25 required to be paid for a period of not less than two years. In addi- 26 tion, the full amount of any other charges, taxes or fees which would be 27 required to be paid to, or collected by, the commissioner during the 28 entire registration period if registrations were issued for twelve month 29 periods shall be paid to the commissioner at the time of such registra- 30 tion or renewal of registration for commercial vehicles. The full 31 amount of any other charges, taxes or fees for non-commercial vehicles 32 with a single registration as provided in paragraph a of this subdivi- 33 sion shall be paid to the commissioner at the time of such registration. 34 The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations for the issuance 35 of registration renewals extended as required in this paragraph. Howev- 36 er, such regulations may provide that the initial issuance of extended 37 renewals be accomplished over a two year period. The commissioner may by 38 regulation exempt from the provisions of this paragraph registrations 39 for motor vehicles issued in conjunction with any long-term registration 40 program or registration reciprocity or proration agreement which this 41 state has established or to which this state is a party. 42 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 43 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately the addition, amend- 44 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 45 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 46 completed on or before such effective date.